District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-784

Charges for treatment of patients.

Repealed.

July 3, 1945, 59 Stat. 366, ch. 263, title II, § 201
July 26, 1946, 60 Stat. 687, ch. 672, title II, § 201
July 8, 1947, 61 Stat. 265, ch. 210, title II,§ 201
1981 Ed., § 32-117.
1973 Ed., § 32-318a.